Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 4, article 5, sections 1; 2; 3; 4; 5; 6; 7; 8; and 9, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Session Laws: 26-06960 Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 4, article 5, section 1 Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62A.31, subdivision 1b, is amended to read: Subd. 1b. Preexisting condition coverage. new text begin (a) new text end The policy must cover preexisting conditions during the first six months of coverage if the insured was not diagnosed or treated for the particular condition during the 90 days immediately preceding the effective date of coverage. new text begin (b) The policy must cover preexisting conditions if the insured meets the requirements under subdivision 1r, paragraph (c). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 4, article 5, section 2 Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62A.31, subdivision 1f, is amended to read: Subd. 1f. Suspension based on entitlement to medical assistance. (a) The policy or certificate must provide that benefits and premiums under the policy or certificate shall be suspended for any period that may be provided by federal regulation at the request of the policyholder or certificate holder for the period, not to exceed 24 months, in which the policyholder or certificate holder has applied for and is determined to be entitled to medical assistance under title XIX of the Social Security Act, but only if the policyholder or certificate holder notifies the issuer of the policy or certificate within 90 days after the date the individual becomes entitled to this assistance. (b) If suspension occurs and if the policyholder or certificate holder loses entitlement to this medical assistance, the policy or certificate shall be automatically reinstated, effective as of the date of termination of this entitlement, if the policyholder or certificate holder provides notice of loss of the entitlement within 90 days after the date of the loss and pays the premium attributable to the period, effective as of the date of termination of entitlement. (c) The policy must provide that upon reinstatement (1) there is no waiting periodnew text begin if the enrollee meets the requirements under subdivision 1r, paragraph (c),new text end with respect to treatment of preexisting conditions, (2) coverage is provided which is substantially equivalent to coverage in effect before the date of the suspension. If the suspended policy provided coverage for outpatient prescription drugs, reinstitution of the policy for Medicare Part D enrollees must be without coverage for outpatient prescription drugs and must otherwise provide coverage substantially equivalent to the coverage in effect before the date of suspension, and (3) premiums are classified on terms that are at least as favorable to the policyholder or certificate holder as the premium classification terms that would have applied to the policyholder or certificate holder had coverage not been suspended. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 4, article 5, section 3 Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62A.31, subdivision 1h, is amended to read: Subd. 1h. Limitations on denials, conditions, and pricing of coverage. new text begin (a) new text end No health carrier issuing Medicare-related coverage in this state may impose preexisting condition limitations or otherwise deny or condition the issuance or effectiveness of any such coverage available for sale in this state, nor may it discriminate in the pricing of such coverage, because of the health status, claims experience, receipt of health care, medical condition, or age of an applicant where an application for such coverage is submitted: (1) prior to or during the six-month period beginning with the first day of the month in which an individual first enrolled for benefits under Medicare Part B; or (2) during the open enrollment perioddeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin if the applicant:new text end new text begin (i) is age 65 to 70 and the applicant is applying for coverage during the open enrollment period for the first time; and new text end new text begin (ii) meets the requirements under subdivision 1r, paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), the premium increases permitted under subdivision 1r are allowed. new text end new text begin (c)new text end This subdivision applies to each Medicare-related coverage offered by a health carrier regardless of whether the individual has attained the age of 65 years. new text begin (d)new text end If an individual who is enrolled in Medicare Part B due to disability status is involuntarily disenrolled due to loss of disability status, the individual is eligible for another six-month enrollment period provided under this subdivision beginning the first day of the month in which the individual later becomes eligible for and enrolls again in Medicare Part B and during the open enrollment period. An individual who is or was previously enrolled in Medicare Part B due to disability status is eligible for another six-month enrollment period under this subdivision beginning the first day of the month in which the individual has attained the age of 65 years and either maintains enrollment in, or enrolls again in, Medicare Part B deleted text begin and during the open enrollment perioddeleted text end . If an individual enrolled in Medicare Part B voluntarily disenrolls from Medicare Part B because the individual becomes enrolled under an employee welfare benefit plan, the individual is eligible for another six-month enrollment period, as provided in this subdivision, beginning the first day of the month in which the individual later becomes eligible for and enrolls again in Medicare Part B deleted text begin and during the open enrollment perioddeleted text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 4, article 5, section 4 Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62A.31, subdivision 1p, is amended to read: Subd. 1p. Renewal or continuation provisions. new text begin (a) new text end Medicare supplement policies and certificates shall include a renewal or continuation provision. The language or specifications of the provision shall be consistent with the type of contract issued. The provision shall be appropriately captioned and shall appear on the first page of the policy or certificate, and shall include any reservation by the issuer of the right to change premiums. Except for riders or endorsements by which the issuer effectuates a request made in writing by the insured, exercises a specifically reserved right under a Medicare supplement policy or certificate, or is required to reduce or eliminate benefits to avoid duplication of Medicare benefits, all riders or endorsements added to a Medicare supplement policy or certificate after the date of issue or at reinstatement or renewal that reduce or eliminate benefits or coverage in the policy or certificate shall require a signed acceptance by the insured. After the date of policy or certificate issue, a rider or endorsement that increases benefits or coverage with a concomitant increase in premium during the policy or certificate term shall be agreed to in writing and signed by the insured, unless the benefits are required by the minimum standards for Medicare supplement policies or if the increased benefits or coverage is required by law. Where a separate additional premium is charged for benefits provided in connection with riders or endorsements, the premium charge shall be set forth in the policy, declaration page, or certificate.new text begin If a Medicare supplement policy or certificate contains limitations with respect to preexisting conditions, the limitations must appear as a separate paragraph of the policy or certificate and be labeled as "preexisting condition limitations."new text end new text begin (b) new text end Issuers of accident and sickness policies or certificates that provide hospital or medical expense coverage on an expense incurred or indemnity basis to persons eligible for Medicare shall provide to those applicants a "Guide to Health Insurance for People with Medicare" in the form developed by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and in a type size no smaller than 12-point type. Delivery of the guide must be made whether or not such policies or certificates are advertised, solicited, or issued as Medicare supplement policies or certificates as defined in this section and section 62A.3099. Except in the case of direct response issuers, delivery of the guide must be made to the applicant at the time of application, and acknowledgment of receipt of the guide must be obtained by the issuer. Direct response issuers shall deliver the guide to the applicant upon request, but no later than the time at which the policy is delivered. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 4, article 5, section 5 Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62A.31, subdivision 1r, is amended to read: Subd. 1r. Community rate. new text begin (a) new text end Each health maintenance organization, health service plan corporation, insurer, or fraternal benefit society that sells Medicare-related coverage shall establish a separate community rate for that coverage. deleted text begin Beginning January 1, 1993,deleted text end No Medicare-related coverage may be offered, issued, sold, or renewed to a Minnesota resident, except at the community rate required by this subdivision. The same community rate must apply to newly issued coverage and to renewal coverage. new text begin (b) new text end For coverage that supplements Medicare and for the Part A rate calculation for plans governed by section 1833 of the federal Social Security Act, United States Code, title 42, section 1395, et seq., the community rate may take into account only the following factors: (1) actuarially valid differences in benefit designs or provider networks; (2) geographic variations in rates if preapproved by the commissioner of commerce; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (3) premium reductions in recognition of healthy lifestyle behaviors, including but not limited to, refraining from the use of tobacco. Premium reductions must be actuarially valid and must relate only to those healthy lifestyle behaviors that have a proven positive impact on health. Factors used by the health carrier making this premium reduction must be filed with and approved by the commissioner of commercedeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (4) for coverage that supplements Medicare, premium increases on an individual who enrolls in a Medicare supplement policy outside of the individual's initial enrollment period in Medicare Part B. This paragraph does not apply to individuals who enroll in a Medicare supplement policy pursuant to subdivision 1u, paragraph (b), clauses (1) to (8). The increases described in paragraph (c) apply each year an individual is enrolled in a Medicare supplement policy and are in addition to any standard increases in community rate. new text end new text begin (c) The premium increases permitted under paragraph (b), clause (4): new text end new text begin (1) apply to an individual age 65 to 70; new text end new text begin (2) apply to an individual who enrolls in a Medicare supplement policy pursuant to subdivision 1h, paragraph (a), clause (2); new text end new text begin (3) apply only the first time the individual enrolls; new text end new text begin (4) apply for the duration of time the policy is in force; and new text end new text begin (5) must equal: new text end new text begin (i) for an individual who enrolls during the 2026 open enrollment period, 15 percent; new text end new text begin (ii) for an individual who enrolls during the 2027 open enrollment period, 20 percent; new text end new text begin (iii) for an individual who enrolls during the 2028 open enrollment period, 25 percent; new text end new text begin (iv) for an individual who enrolls during the 2029 open enrollment period, 30 percent; new text end new text begin (v) for an individual who enrolls during the 2030 open enrollment period, 35 percent; and new text end new text begin (vi) for an individual who enrolls during an open enrollment period after 2029, 35 percent. new text end new text begin If an individual age 65 to 70 enrolls in a subsequent Medicare supplement policy that is not a replacement or renewal, the individual is not subject to the premium increases as described in paragraph (b), clause (4). new text end deleted text begin For insureds not residing in Anoka, Carver, Chisago, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, or Washington County, a health plan may, at the option of the health carrier, phase in compliance under the following timetable: deleted text end deleted text begin (i) a premium adjustment as of March 1, 1993, that consists of one-half of the difference between the community rate that would be applicable to the person as of March 1, 1993, and the premium rate that would be applicable to the person as of March 1, 1993, under the rate schedule permitted on December 31, 1992. A health plan may, at the option of the health carrier, implement the entire premium difference described in this clause for any person as of March 1, 1993, if the premium difference would be 15 percent or less of the premium rate that would be applicable to the person as of March 1, 1993, under the rate schedule permitted on December 31, 1992, if the health plan does so uniformly regardless of whether the premium difference causes premiums to rise or to fall. The premium difference described in this clause is in addition to any premium adjustment attributable to medical cost inflation or any other lawful factor and is intended to describe only the premium difference attributable to the transition to the community rate; and deleted text end deleted text begin (ii) with respect to any person whose premium adjustment was constrained under clause (i), a premium adjustment as of January 1, 1994, that consists of the remaining one-half of the premium difference attributable to the transition to the community rate, as described in clause (i). deleted text end deleted text begin A health plan that initially follows the phase-in timetable may at any subsequent time comply on a more rapid timetable. A health plan that is in full compliance as of January 1, 1993, may not use the phase-in timetable and must remain in full compliance. Health plans that follow the phase-in timetable must charge the same premium rate for newly issued coverage that they charge for renewal coverage. A health plan whose premiums are constrained by clause (i) may take the constraint into account in establishing its community rate. deleted text end deleted text begin From January 1, 1993 to February 28, 1993, a health plan may, at the health carrier's option, charge the community rate under this paragraph or may instead charge premiums permitted as of December 31, 1992. deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 4, article 5, section 6 Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62A.31, subdivision 1u, is amended to read: Subd. 1u. Guaranteed issue for eligible persons. (a)(1) Eligible persons are those individuals described in paragraph (b) who seek to enroll under the policy during the period specified in paragraph (c) and who submit evidence of the date of termination or disenrollment described in paragraph (b), or of the date of Medicare Part D enrollment, with the application for a Medicare supplement policy. (2) With respect to eligible persons, an issuer shall not: deny or condition the issuance or effectiveness of a Medicare supplement policy described in paragraph (c) that is offered and is available for issuance to new enrollees by the issuer; discriminate in the pricing of such a Medicare supplement policy because of health status, claims experience, receipt of health care, medical condition, or age; or impose an exclusion of benefits based upon a preexisting condition under such a Medicare supplement policy. (b) An eligible person is an individual described in any of the following: (1) the individual is enrolled under an employee welfare benefit plan that provides health benefits that supplement the benefits under Medicare; and the plan terminates, or the plan ceases to provide all such supplemental health benefits to the individual; (2) the individual is enrolled with a Medicare Advantage organization under a Medicare Advantage plan under Medicare Part C, and any of the following circumstances apply, or the individual is 65 years of age or older and is enrolled with a Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE) provider under section 1894 of the federal Social Security Act, and there are circumstances similar to those described in this clause that would permit discontinuance of the individual's enrollment with the provider if the individual were enrolled in a Medicare Advantage plan: (i) the organization's or plan's certification under Medicare Part C has been terminated or the organization has terminated or otherwise discontinued providing the plan in the area in which the individual resides; (ii) the individual is no longer eligible to elect the plan because of a change in the individual's place of residence or other change in circumstances specified by the secretary, but not including termination of the individual's enrollment on the basis described in section 1851(g)(3)(B) of the federal Social Security Act, United States Code, title 42, section 1395w-21(g)(3)(b) (where the individual has not paid premiums on a timely basis or has engaged in disruptive behavior as specified in standards under section 1856 of the federal Social Security Act, United States Code, title 42, section 1395w-26), or the plan is terminated for all individuals within a residence area; (iii) the individual demonstrates, in accordance with guidelines established by the Secretary, that: (A) the organization offering the plan substantially violated a material provision of the organization's contract in relation to the individual, including the failure to provide an enrollee on a timely basis medically necessary care for which benefits are available under the plan or the failure to provide such covered care in accordance with applicable quality standards; or (B) the organization, or agent or other entity acting on the organization's behalf, materially misrepresented the plan's provisions in marketing the plan to the individual; or (iv) the individual meets such other exceptional conditions as the secretary may provide; (3)(i) the individual is enrolled with: (A) an eligible organization under a contract under section 1876 of the federal Social Security Act, United States Code, title 42, section 1395mm (Medicare cost); (B) a similar organization operating under demonstration project authority, effective for periods before April 1, 1999; (C) an organization under an agreement under section 1833(a)(1)(A) of the federal Social Security Act, United States Code, title 42, section 1395l(a)(1)(A) (health care prepayment plan); or (D) an organization under a Medicare Select policy under section 62A.318 or the similar law of another state; and (ii) the enrollment ceases under the same circumstances that would permit discontinuance of an individual's election of coverage under clause (2); (4) the individual is enrolled under a Medicare supplement policy, and the enrollment ceases because: (i)(A) of the insolvency of the issuer or bankruptcy of the nonissuer organization; or (B) of other involuntary termination of coverage or enrollment under the policy; (ii) the issuer of the policy substantially violated a material provision of the policy; or (iii) the issuer, or an agent or other entity acting on the issuer's behalf, materially misrepresented the policy's provisions in marketing the policy to the individual; (5)(i) the individual was enrolled under a Medicare supplement policy and terminates that enrollment and subsequently enrolls, for the first time, with any Medicare Advantage organization under a Medicare Advantage plan under Medicare Part C; any eligible organization under a contract under section 1876 of the federal Social Security Act, United States Code, title 42, section 1395mm (Medicare cost); any similar organization operating under demonstration project authority; any PACE provider under section 1894 of the federal Social Security Act, or a Medicare Select policy under section 62A.318 or the similar law of another state; and (ii) the subsequent enrollment under item (i) is terminated by the enrollee during any period within the first 12 months of the subsequent enrollment during which the enrollee is permitted to terminate the subsequent enrollment under section 1851(e) of the federal Social Security Act; (6) the individual, upon first enrolling for benefits under Medicare Part B, enrolls in a Medicare Advantage plan under Medicare Part C, or with a PACE provider under section 1894 of the federal Social Security Act, and disenrolls from the plan by not later than 12 months after the effective date of enrollment; (7) the individual enrolls in a Medicare Part D plan during the initial Part D enrollment period, as defined under United States Code, title 42, section 1395ss(v)(6)(D), and, at the time of enrollment in Part D, was enrolled under a Medicare supplement policy that covers outpatient prescription drugs and the individual terminates enrollment in the Medicare supplement policy and submits evidence of enrollment in Medicare Part D along with the application for a policy described in paragraph (e), clause (4); deleted text begin ordeleted text end (8) the individual was enrolled in a state public program and is losing coverage due to the unwinding of the Medicaid continuous enrollment conditions, as provided by Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 155.420 (d)(9) and (d)(1), and Public Law 117-328, section 5131 (2022)deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (9) the individual meets the requirements under subdivision 1r, paragraph (c), and enrolls during the open enrollment period. new text end (c)(1) In the case of an individual described in paragraph (b), clause (1), the guaranteed issue period begins on the later of: (i) the date the individual receives a notice of termination or cessation of all supplemental health benefits or, if a notice is not received, notice that a claim has been denied because of a termination or cessation; or (ii) the date that the applicable coverage terminates or ceases; and ends 63 days after the later of those two dates. (2) In the case of an individual described in paragraph (b), clause (2), (3), (5), or (6), whose enrollment is terminated involuntarily, the guaranteed issue period begins on the date that the individual receives a notice of termination and ends 63 days after the date the applicable coverage is terminated. (3) In the case of an individual described in paragraph (b), clause (4), item (i), the guaranteed issue period begins on the earlier of: (i) the date that the individual receives a notice of termination, a notice of the issuer's bankruptcy or insolvency, or other such similar notice if any; and (ii) the date that the applicable coverage is terminated, and ends on the date that is 63 days after the date the coverage is terminated. (4) In the case of an individual described in paragraph (b), clause (2), (4), (5), or (6), who disenrolls voluntarily, the guaranteed issue period begins on the date that is 60 days before the effective date of the disenrollment and ends on the date that is 63 days after the effective date. (5) In the case of an individual described in paragraph (b), clause (7), the guaranteed issue period begins on the date the individual receives notice pursuant to section 1882(v)(2)(B) of the Social Security Act from the Medicare supplement issuer during the 60-day period immediately preceding the initial Part D enrollment period and ends on the date that is 63 days after the effective date of the individual's coverage under Medicare Part D. (6) In the case of an individual described in paragraph (b) but not described in this paragraph, the guaranteed issue period begins on the effective date of disenrollment and ends on the date that is 63 days after the effective date. (7) deleted text begin For all individuals described in paragraph (b), the open enrollment period is a guaranteed issue period.deleted text end new text begin For an individual described in paragraph (b), clause (9), the guarantee issue period is the open enrollment period.new text end (d)(1) In the case of an individual described in paragraph (b), clause (5), or deemed to be so described, pursuant to this paragraph, whose enrollment with an organization or provider described in paragraph (b), clause (5), item (i), is involuntarily terminated within the first 12 months of enrollment, and who, without an intervening enrollment, enrolls with another such organization or provider, the subsequent enrollment is deemed to be an initial enrollment described in paragraph (b), clause (5). (2) In the case of an individual described in paragraph (b), clause (6), or deemed to be so described, pursuant to this paragraph, whose enrollment with a plan or in a program described in paragraph (b), clause (6), is involuntarily terminated within the first 12 months of enrollment, and who, without an intervening enrollment, enrolls in another such plan or program, the subsequent enrollment is deemed to be an initial enrollment described in paragraph (b), clause (6). (3) For purposes of paragraph (b), clauses (5) and (6), no enrollment of an individual with an organization or provider described in paragraph (b), clause (5), item (i), or with a plan or in a program described in paragraph (b), clause (6), may be deemed to be an initial enrollment under this paragraph after the two-year period beginning on the date on which the individual first enrolled with the organization, provider, plan, or program. (e) The Medicare supplement policy to which eligible persons are entitled under: (1) paragraph (b), clauses (1) to (4), is any Medicare supplement policy that has a benefit package consisting of the basic Medicare supplement plan described in section 62A.316, paragraph (a), plus any combination of the three optional riders described in section 62A.316, paragraph (b), clauses (1) to (3), offered by any issuer; (2) paragraph (b), clause (5), is the same Medicare supplement policy in which the individual was most recently previously enrolled, if available from the same issuer, or, if not so available, any policy described in clause (1) offered by any issuer, except that after December 31, 2005, if the individual was most recently enrolled in a Medicare supplement policy with an outpatient prescription drug benefit, a Medicare supplement policy to which the individual is entitled under paragraph (b), clause (5), is: (i) the policy available from the same issuer but modified to remove outpatient prescription drug coverage; or (ii) at the election of the policyholder, a policy described in clause (4), except that the policy may be one that is offered and available for issuance to new enrollees that is offered by any issuer; (3) paragraph (b), clause (6), is any Medicare supplement policy offered by any issuer; (4) paragraph (b), clause (7), is a Medicare supplement policy that has a benefit package classified as a basic plan under section 62A.316 if the enrollee's existing Medicare supplement policy is a basic plan or, if the enrollee's existing Medicare supplement policy is an extended basic plan under section 62A.315, a basic or extended basic plan at the option of the enrollee, provided that the policy is offered and is available for issuance to new enrollees by the same issuer that issued the individual's Medicare supplement policy with outpatient prescription drug coverage. The issuer must permit the enrollee to retain all optional benefits contained in the enrollee's existing coverage, other than outpatient prescription drugs, subject to the provision that the coverage be offered and available for issuance to new enrollees by the same issuer. (f)(1) At the time of an event described in paragraph (b), because of which an individual loses coverage or benefits due to the termination of a contract or agreement, policy, or plan, the organization that terminates the contract or agreement, the issuer terminating the policy, or the administrator of the plan being terminated, respectively, shall notify the individual of the individual's rights under this subdivision, and of the obligations of issuers of Medicare supplement policies under paragraph (a). The notice must be communicated contemporaneously with the notification of termination. (2) At the time of an event described in paragraph (b), because of which an individual ceases enrollment under a contract or agreement, policy, or plan, the organization that offers the contract or agreement, regardless of the basis for the cessation of enrollment, the issuer offering the policy, or the administrator of the plan, respectively, shall notify the individual of the individual's rights under this subdivision, and of the obligations of issuers of Medicare supplement policies under paragraph (a). The notice must be communicated within ten working days of the issuer receiving notification of disenrollment. (g) Reference in this subdivision to a situation in which, or to a basis upon which, an individual's coverage has been terminated does not provide authority under the laws of this state for the termination in that situation or upon that basis. (h) An individual's rights under this subdivision are in addition to, and do not modify or limit, the individual's rights under subdivision 1h. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 4, article 5, section 7 Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62A.31, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Prohibited policy provisions. (a) A Medicare supplement policy or certificate in force in the state shall not contain benefits that duplicate benefits provided by Medicare or contain exclusions on coverage that are more restrictive than those of Medicare. Duplication of benefits is permitted to the extent permitted under subdivision 1s, paragraph (a), for benefits provided by Medicare Part D. (b) No Medicare supplement policy or certificate may use waivers to exclude, limit, or reduce coverage or benefits for specifically named or described preexisting diseases or physical conditionsnew text begin , except as permitted under subdivision 1hnew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 4, article 5, section 8 Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62A.44, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Questions. (a) Application forms shall include the following questions designed to elicit information as to whether, as of the date of the application, the applicant has another Medicare supplement or other health insurance policy or certificate in force or whether a Medicare supplement policy or certificate is intended to replace any other accident and sickness policy or certificate presently in force. A supplementary application or other form to be signed by the applicant and agent containing the questions and statements may be used. "(1) You do not need more than one Medicare supplement policy or certificate. (2) If you purchase this policy, you may want to evaluate your existing health coverage and decide if you need multiple coverages. (3) You may be eligible for benefits under Medicaid and may not need a Medicare supplement policy or certificate. (4) The benefits and premiums under your Medicare supplement policy or certificate can be suspended, if requested, during your entitlement to benefits under Medicaid for 24 months. You must request this suspension within 90 days of becoming eligible for Medicaid. If you are no longer entitled to Medicaid, your policy or certificate will be reinstated if requested within 90 days of losing Medicaid eligibility. (5) Counseling services may be available in Minnesota to provide advice concerning medical assistance through state Medicaid, Qualified Medicare Beneficiaries (QMBs), and Specified Low-Income Medicare Beneficiaries (SLMBs). To the best of your knowledge: (1) Do you have another Medicare supplement policy or certificate in force? (a) If so, with which company? (b) If so, do you intend to replace your current Medicare supplement policy with this policy or certificate? (2) Do you have any other health insurance policies that provide benefits which this Medicare supplement policy or certificate would duplicate? (a) If so, please name the company. (b) What kind of policy? (3) Are you covered for medical assistance through the state Medicaid program? If so, which of the following programs provides coverage for you? (a) Specified Low-Income Medicare Beneficiary (SLMB), (b) Qualified Medicare Beneficiary (QMB), or (c) full Medicaid Beneficiary?" (b) Agents shall list any other health insurance policies they have sold to the applicant. (1) List policies sold that are still in force. (2) List policies sold in the past five years that are no longer in force. (c) In the case of a direct response issuer, a copy of the application or supplemental form, signed by the applicant, and acknowledged by the insurer, shall be returned to the applicant by the insurer on delivery of the policy or certificate. (d) Upon determining that a sale will involve replacement of Medicare supplement coverage, any issuer, other than a direct response issuer, or its agent, shall furnish the applicant, before issuance or delivery of the Medicare supplement policy or certificate, a notice regarding replacement of Medicare supplement coverage. One copy of the notice signed by the applicant and the agent, except where the coverage is sold without an agent, shall be provided to the applicant and an additional signed copy shall be retained by the issuer. A direct response issuer shall deliver to the applicant at the time of the issuance of the policy or certificate the notice regarding replacement of Medicare supplement coverage. (e) The notice required by paragraph (d) for an issuer shall be provided in substantially the following form in no less than 12-point type: "NOTICE TO APPLICANT REGARDING REPLACEMENT OF MEDICARE SUPPLEMENT INSURANCE (Insurance company's name and address) SAVE THIS NOTICE! IT MAY BE IMPORTANT TO YOU IN THE FUTURE. According to (your application) (information you have furnished), you intend to terminate existing Medicare supplement insurance and replace it with a policy or certificate to be issued by (Company Name) Insurance Company. Your new policy or certificate will provide 30 days within which you may decide without cost whether you desire to keep the policy or certificate. You should review this new coverage carefully. Compare it with all accident and sickness coverage you now have. If, after due consideration, you find that purchase of this Medicare supplement coverage is a wise decision you should terminate your present Medicare supplement policy. You should evaluate the need for other accident and sickness coverage you have that may duplicate this policy. STATEMENT TO APPLICANT BY ISSUER, AGENT, (BROKER OR OTHER REPRESENTATIVE): I have reviewed your current medical or health insurance coverage. To the best of my knowledge this Medicare supplement policy will not duplicate your existing Medicare supplement policy because you intend to terminate the existing Medicare supplement policy. The replacement policy or certificate is being purchased for the following reason(s) (check one): . Additional benefits . No change in benefits, but lower premiums . Fewer benefits and lower premiums . Other (please specify) . . . new text begin (1) Health conditions which you may presently have (preexisting conditions) may not be immediately or fully covered under the new policy or certificate. This could result in denial or delay of a claim for benefits under the new policy or certificate, whereas a similar claim might have been payable under your present policy or certificate. new text end new text begin (2) State law provides that your replacement policy or certificate may not contain new preexisting conditions, waiting periods, elimination periods, or probationary periods. The insurer will waive any time periods applicable to preexisting conditions, waiting periods, elimination periods, or probationary periods in the new policy (or coverage) for similar benefits to the extent the time was spent (depleted) under the original policy or certificate. new text end new text begin (3) If you still wish to terminate your present policy or certificate and replace it with new coverage, be certain to truthfully and completely answer all questions on the application concerning your medical and health history. Failure to include all material medical information on an application may provide a basis for the company to deny any future claims and to refund your premium as though your policy or certificate had never been in force. After the application has been completed and before you sign it, review it carefully to be certain that all information has been properly recorded. (If the policy or certificate is guaranteed issue, this paragraph need not appear.) new text end Do not cancel your present policy or certificate until you have received your new policy or certificate and you are sure that you want to keep it. . (Signature of Agent, Broker, or Other Representative)* . (Typed Name and Address of Issuer, Agent, or Broker) . (Date) . (Applicant's Signature) . (Date) *Signature not required for direct response sales." new text begin (f) Paragraph (e), clauses (1) and (2), of the replacement notice (applicable to preexisting conditions) may be deleted by an issuer if the replacement does not involve application of a new preexisting condition limitation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 4, article 5, section 9 Sec. 9. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Laws 2023, chapter 57, article 2, sections 13, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 114, article 6, section 7; and 66, as amended by Laws 2025, chapter 20, section 290, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end